Missouri, session 2026, HB3331.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 21, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 21.1060, to read as follows:
21.1060. Each state department shall, upon request, provide to the budget
committee of the house of representatives and the appropriations committee of the
senate the following:
(1) The total number and names of nonprofit corporations receiving funding
from the department;
(2) Any copies of Internal Revenue Service Form 990 for such nonprofit
corporations in possession of the department;
(3) The total number of individuals served by such nonprofit corporation each
year, including the zip codes of those served; and
(4) Copies of any memorandum of understanding between the department and a
nonprofit corporation.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.